Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-711
Road tax; how expended.

All money arising from the levying of a road tax against or upon property in a city of the first class shall belong to such city and shall be expended upon the streets and grades in such city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 87, p. 294;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 120;

R.S.1913, § 4979;

C.S.1922, § 4148;

C.S.1929, § 16-710;

Laws 1935, c. 31, § 1, p. 135;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-710;

R.S.1943, § 16-711;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 179.

The amendment of statute without saving clause, during course of city's litigation for transfer of road funds, is fatal to all rights based on original statute not retained in the amended statute. City of Beatrice v. Gage County, 130 Neb. 850, 266 N.W. 777 (1936).